spellchecker/hunspell/oss/hyph_os_OS.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.а2
.а1ри1
.ас1т
.ат1р
.аг1р
.а1г
.ап1р
.а1п
.в2
.ва3жн2о.
.1ва
.вæм2
.вæм1н
.вæм1но
.во3д2
.вик3нах
.1ви
.вик2н
.вик1на
.ви1д4
.вер2н
.ве3р1ни
.вес2
.ве3с1то
.ве3ст2т
.ве3ст2и.
.ве3д2но
.вед1н
.вдиг4
.в2д
.в1ди
.вди3гн2а.
.вдиг1на
.вди3гна2т.
.вди3гна2х.
.вдиг3нах
.взе3хм
.в2з2
.рас1т
.раз1
.ри2т1м
.ри1т
.ревно2с3т4т
.рев1н
.рев1но
.ру4ск2и.
.ру1ск
.фæ1с2
.м2
.магис3трал
.1ма
.ма1г
.ма1ги
.мос1
.1мо
.мо3с1то
.молих3м
.мо1ли
.ми1сл
.миг1р
.ме3с4т2о.
.мес1то
.б2
.бо3нт2и.
.бол4ни
.бол1н
.бо3нти1т
.бо3нтий
.би1х
.бе3д1на
.б2е
.бед2н
.с2
.спы1х
.с1пы
.о2
.ов3ц
.ом1р
.об1р
.об1л
.ос1м
.ос1л
.ос1з
.от1в2
.от1р
.о1то1
.от1с
.ог1л
.о1ч1а
.очис3т4ван
.о1чи
.очисв1т2
.очист1ва
.окау2
.ок1р
.оз3н
.оп1р
.оп1л
.оп1и
.оп1у
.лис3ти
.ли3ч4но2сæтæ
.личност4
.лич1н
.лич3но
.æ2
.в1то3р2ц
.в1т2
.тфæ1п2
.т2ег4
.1те
.тег3лы
.те3гн2е.
.тег1не
.настъп3л
.1на
.нас2
.на1стъ
.на1д2л
.на1з
.не1д2
.1не
.и2
.иму1це3
.иму1ц
.ис1
.иг1
.из1м2
.е2
.ев1р
.ес1ен
.е1се
.ед1р
.ед2нат
.ед1н
.ед1на
.ед2но1т
.ед1но
.ед2ни1т
.ед1ни
.ефек3ти
.г2
.г4ва
.2гв
.го1д2
.у2
.ув1р
.ус1к
.у1лы1
.ут1р
.учас3т4ни1ц
.у1ча
.учас2т1н
.участ1ни
.уп1р
.чи3слы
.1чи
.чес3ти
.1че
.чувст3ве
.чувсв1т2
.к2
.кас1т
.качест3
.ка1че
.каз4ван
.ка2з1в
.каз1ва
.ка3зва3не
.ко3нници
.кон4ни1ц
.кон1н
.кон1ни
фæ2
.1ц2
.г2
.1гу1
.ы2
.ы2в1л
.ы1в
.д2
.дос1
.до3с4та1ве
.дос1та
.ди1г2
.1ди
.де3сн2и.
.1де
.дес2ни
.з2
.зо1
.зор2
.п2
.па3з2
.пра3в4ну
.пра2в1н
.пра3в1да
.прав2д
.про3све1те
.прос2в
.прос1ве
.прос3ти
.прос3те2н.
.прос2те
.прие4м3а2т.
.при1ем
.прие1ма
.при1е2л
.при1е2т
.при1е2х
.повес3ти
.по1ве
.поро3ч4нос
.по1ро
.пороч1н
.пороч3но
.по3с2т
.по4с3т2и.
.по3сту
.по4с3ти1т
.поч2н
.по3чн2а.
.поч1на
.по1ко2и
.по1к
.по1зн
.пуб1
.пу3ск2а.
.ху1
æмивы3хм
.1жи
æми1вы
2а.
а1ам
а1ал
а1ат
а1ан
а1ад
а1аз
а3рве1ди
ав1м
ав1с
авст2
а1во
аво3д2ни
авод1н
ав3ла
а3владыв2а.
ав4ла1ды
авлады1в
авлады1ва
а3владыват
а1вли
а2в1н
ав4ну
авис3ти
а1ви
ави1к
а1ве
авес1т
аве3дник
авед1н
авед1ни
а1фæ
а1в2ц
ав3з2
а1ра
араст4
арст3ват
ар1с
арс2т2
арсв1т2
арст1ва
а1ро
а1рæ
а1ри
ари3с2та
ари3сту
арих1м
а1ре
ар3ес1та
ар3ес1ти
аре1к
а1ру
а1фæ
а1ры
арых1м
ам1р
амос4
а1мо
а2м1л
а1ми
ами3сл2и.
ами3сли1т
ами3слы
амис3лы
а1ме
аме1тр
а1му
а1фæ
а1мы
аба1вл
а1ба
а3брави1т
абра1ви
аб1р2и.
аб1ре
а1бо
а1бл
а2б1лиз
а1би
а1б2е
абелы3за
абе1лы
а1бу
а1фæ
а1бы
ас3в
ас1б
а2с3лæм
ас1лын
астав3л
ас1та
аст1в2
а3ст4ва1ца
аст1ва
ас1три
а4с3тоы2ван
ас1то
асто1ы1в
астоы1ва
а1с2той1
ас3т3ници1т
аст4ни1ц
ас2т1н
аст1ни
а4стул
а1с1тин
асту3г2
а3сту1га
ас3тигн
а3с4тиг3на2т.
асту4гнат
астуг1на
астъпни1че3
астъп1н
астъп1ни
а2с3тъ1пы
ас3неман
ас1не
асне1ма
а1снет
а1си
аск2
а1скав
ас1кат
а1с2ках
ас1кв
ас3ко
ас3къ
а1фæ
ас3п
а1о
ао1б
ао2т3е2ц.
ао1те
аоте1ц
ао1к
а1ла
а1л2мо
ал1м
а1ло
а1лæ
а1ли
али3с2та
али3ст2и.
а3лиз
а1лы
алык2т
алы3к1та
алы3кти
алци2т
ал1ц
а1лы
2ал1д2
ата1с
а1та
а2т3фæ
ав1т2
а1тро
атро1г2
ат3репе1ри
атре1пе
а3т4репе1ры
а1тру
ат3фæ
ат1л
а1т2т
а3т2ник
а2т1н
ат1ни
а1ти
ати3ска
атиск2
ател4ст3ва2т.
а1те
ател1с
ателст2
ателсв1т2
ателст1ва
а1ту
а1тъ
ана1с2
а1на
ана1стъ3
ана1х2т
ан1ра
ан3ст2
а2н1с
аничес3т
а1ни
ани1че
ани1х2т
а3не
а1ну
а1ив
а1ир
а1им
аи1ме
а1ис
аисторичес3
аис1то
аисто1ри
аистори1че
а1ил
а1ин
аи1н2ц
а1ич
а1и1з2
а1и1ц
а1ем
ае1мий
а1ел
а1ет
а1ен
а1ек
а1ег
а1ед
а1ех
аех1м
аех3т
а1ей1
а1ец
а1г
агра1б2
а2г3раб1в
а2г3ра1ды
а4гри
а2г3ри1жи
а4гфæ
а2г1лу
а2гн
аг1ент
а1ге
а1у
ау1ми
ау1к
а4чис
а1чи
ач3ис3лы2н.
ачи3слы1ни
а1чу
а1ка
ак1в
а3к2вал.
ак1ва
ак4ваг
а1к2ви1т
ак1ви
а2к1ре
ак3с
а1ко
а4клы3
ак3лытие
аклыт2
аклы1ти
ак1т
ак4та
ак4т2и.
ак2тир
ак2ти1т
а1к2тъ
а1ки
а1ке
а1ку
а1къ
а1гл
а1ы1в
ау2в1л
а1ыс
а1ыл
а1ы2т
а1ын
ау2но
ау2ни1т
ау1ни
а1ыд
а1ых
ад1в
а3два1ни
ад1ва
ад1м
а1до
адо3сту
а1дфæ
а1дт
ад3нат
ад1н
ад1на
ади1хм
а1ди
адесет4
а1де
аде1се
адесе3тт
адей3
адей2ст2
адейс2
а1фæ
ад3п
а1дж
аз1р
аз2реы
а1з2ры
аз3м2
а1зов
аз1ор
аз1от
аз1л
а1зи
азиск3
а2з1ис
а1зе
аз1уч
а1зы3в
аз1ы3д
азпад2
аз1п2
азпа3д1не
азпад1н
а1п
ап3рав2а.
а2пра1ва
а3прават
аправ3л
а2п1с
апове3дт
апо1ве
апос3
апоз3
а2п1лак
а2п1т
а2п1н
апус1
ах3в
а3хр
а4хран1в
а4хра3не
ах3ранен
а1хл
а1ху
а1фа
аф1р
а1фо
а1фи
ай3с2
ай1
ай2с1т2
айс3в1т2
а1цр
а1жо
а1жно1т
æм1н
æм1но
а1жи1
æмивых3м
æми1вы
а1фæ
а2ж3д
2в.
1ва
ва1р2на
вар1н
вас3т
ва1лу
ва1фæ
2ват2о.
ва1то
3ва1те
ва1др
ва1хм
ва1х2т
3вайк
вай1
3ваций
ва1ци
вæм2
ва1ж1на
вæм1н
ва1ж1ни
в1ра1ц
рва1з
в1ро
в1ри1т
1рвем
в1реи
в1ре2д.
1рве1ды
в1ру
в3ст2в2а.
всв1т2
вст1ва
вст4вал
в3ст2ва1та
в1св1то
вст3ве2н.
вст3вен2о.
всв1те1но
в1св1ту
встъп4
встъ3пван
встъ2п1в
встъп1ва
в1ск
1в2сы
вори3х2т
во1ри
во1фæ
4воры1в
во1ры
во1б
4вободит2е.
вобо1ди
вободи1т
вободи1те
1вобæм
во1сл
во4с3ла1ве
во1фæ
вол2ст2
вол1с
3волит2е.
во1ли
воли1т
воли1те
во1ти
во1тъ
во3н
во4ин
во1и
вое1в
во1е
во1к
водей3ст1ви
во1де
водей1
водейс2
водей2ст
водейсв1т2
1во1п
3владывай1
в4ла1ды
влады1в
влады1ва
4влыв1то1ры
влыт1в2
влы1к
влы1зе
влы1
3в2тарын
в1та
вта1ры
1вт2и.
в2теч
в1те
в1н
1в2ног1
в1но
вноп1
в2ниг
в1ни
в2н2е.
в1не
1ви
ви1сн
ви3сг2и.
вис2г
вис1ги
ви3сги1т
вити2е
ви1т
виних3
ви1ни
ви1ет
ви1ко
вик2н
ви3кнат
вик1на
ви2д1р
3ви1до
вид2н
ви1з
ви1хм
4вæмв2а.
вæм1в
вæм1ва
ве3стутел.
весту1т
весту1те
ве3стух
ве3сте3на
вес1те
ве3с2те1но
вес2тыт
вес1ты
велы1ни2
ве1лы
2в1ето1æ
ве3то
3ветлы2н.
вет1л
3ветлын2и.
ветлы1ни
3вет1лы
ве1и1т
ве1ет
веч2
ве1ч1на
веч1н
ве1ч1ни
вечест3
ве1че
век1л
ве1ки
1вег
вед4ни1ка
вед1н
вед1ни
вез2д3н
вез1д2
1вех
ве1хм
ве1х2т
веца1ни2
ве1ца
ве1же1
4вувал.
ву1ва
1вувац
вук2
ву1ка
ву1ко
3вчейни2к.
в1че
в2чей
вчей1н
вчей1ни
3вчейни1ка
2вк
в1ка
в1ки
3фæр3ждаван
фæр1ж
фææм4да
фæр2ж1д
фææмда1ва
фæоб1
фæ1о
1фæт
1фæн
фæ1г
1фæд
фæ1дв
фæ1п
в2ц
в3ца
в2г
1в1га
1вг2и.
в1ги
1вги1т
1в1г2е
1вы
в2д
3вдав
в1да
4в3дават
вда1ва
в3дан
в4да2н.
1вдае
1вдау
в3д2и.
в1ди
1вди1во
в3ди1т
вди3гн2е.
вдиг1не
в1ды1
вдыс2
в2з2
в4зе1ма
3вземан
в1па
впо1
впус1
в2х
в1ц
4равлы
3равлыва3не
равлы1
равлы1в
равлы1ва
4равител1н
ра1ви
рави1т
рави1те
равих3т
3равы1не
ра1вы
3равда1ни
рав2д
рав3дан
рав1да
3ра1мы
ра2бл
рас3ти1т
ра3стуе
ра1стъ
рас1к2
ра1фæ
ра1тр
ра3т1на
ра2т1н
рати3хм
ра1ти
рана2с3
ра1на
4ране2н.
ра3не
рак1л
радо1х
ра1до
рах1м
ра1х1та
рах2т
4рæмныва3не
рæм1н
рæм1ны
рæмны1в
рæмны1ва
р1в
р2в1н
р1м
рмах3
р1ма
р2м1л
р1б
р4бе2н.
рб2е
р1бен
р1с
р2св
р3с2ван
рс1ва
рс2т2
р2с1п
ро1вл
ровик4
ро1ви
1рофæр
ро1фæ
рори3ст2и.
ро1ри
ро1фæ
ро1бо
ро1бл
робнос3ти
ро2б1н
робност2
роб1но
ро1би
ро1фæ
ро1бы
рос2в
ро3свец
рос1ве
ро1сл
рос1тр
рос3ти1т
рос2те
ро3сте3на
рос1тъ
ро1си
ро1ск
ро1фæ
ро1т
ро4в1т2
рот3во1ре
рона3вти
ро1на
рое4но
ро1е
ро1гр
рог1ла
ро1глы
роч4нос
роч1н
роч3но
ро1к
ро1ын
родей3
ро1де
родей2ст4
родейс2
ро1п
ропу3ск2а.
ро1ф
ро1ж2б
р1л
рлих1м
рли1х2т
рт1во
рв1т2
рт3ве1но
рт3вени1т
рв1те1ни
р3в1теник
рт3вений
р1в1ту
рт1р
р1т2т
р1ти
р1ту
р1тъ
р1н
1р2носл
р1но
р3ност
рнос3т2и.
рно1г
рничест3
р1ни
рни1че
ри3а
1риарг
ри1ме
ри1бл
ри1сл
ри3сту1т
ри1ска
риск2
ри1ско
ри1он
ри1ог1
ри1ет
ри1е2ц
ри1гр
1рич1ни
рич1н
ричест3
ри1че
риче4ск2и.
риче1ск
ри1ко
1рици
ри1ц
ри1до
ри1д1н
ри1з2
ри1п2
3рæме1ни
ри1же
ре1рв
ре1ми
3ременни1ц
ре1ме
ремен1н
ремен1ни
1реб2е.
ре1б2е
ре4ср
ре1см
рес1ти
ре2с1к
рес1п
рео3бр
ре1о
ре1л2ц
рен4ска
ре2н1с
ренс3кат
ре1и2т
ре1ет
ре1гл
р2ег
регио3ни
ре1ги
реги1о
ре1кр
ре1ки
ред1р
ре3д2ни1ц
ред1н
ред1ни
ре1зр
ре1з2м2
ре1зо
ре1зи
ре1зе
ре1пи
4репе1ры
ре1пе
ре1ф
1рей1
р1г2
рга1с
р1га
рго1ви2
ру1м
ру1си
ру1ск
ру1фæ
ру1го
ру1до
3рупван
ру2п1в
руп1ва
ру1по
р1ч
рчест1
р1че
р1к
р2кв
р4кван
рк1ва
р2к1с
рк2т
фæ1с1та
фæ3сту1т
фæ1стъ
фæг1л
3фæдни2к.
фæд1н
фæд1ни
3фæми2х.
фæ1жи
р3ги2ы
р1ги
рге1с
р1г2е
ргест2
ры3де
1рыз
ры4з3ал.
ры1за
ры2з3а2н.
ры2з3а2х.
р1д
р2д1с2
р2д1н
р1зо
р1зи
р1зе
р1п
рпы1х
р1пы
р1х
р2х1н
р1ф
р1ц
р1ж
æме3ст2ва
р1же
æмесв1т2
æме3св1то
æм4да
р2ж1д
р3ждаван
æмда1ва
2м.
1ма
мас1ка
маск2
мас1ки
ма1фæ
ма1тр
ма1и
м1в
м1ри
м1ру
2м1б
м1с2
мст2
1мо
мо1а3
мо1рв
мора1з
мо1ра
мо1фæ
мо1б
мо1с2та
мо4с2тов
мос1то
мосто4ы
мос1к2
мо1фæ
мо1тр
мо1ти
мо1тъ
мона3вти
мо1на
мо1гр
мо1гла
мо1к
2мл
м1лив
м1ли1ца
мли1ц
3млиц2е.
мли1це
мæ1з
м1т
мнас3
м1на
мност2
м1но
мно2с3тт
мни1х2т
м1ни
1мим
ми1о2
ми2тр
ми1т
мит1ра
1мин
2мина1ти
ми1на
1мие
ми1ет
1мич
1мик
1ми1ц
миг1
1мид
1мих
2михн2а.
мих1н
мих1на
ме1ру
мес4т2о.
мес1то
ме3с2тот
мес1ти
мес3те
менос3ти
ме1но
ме1н2ц
менци2
ме1е2л
1ме1ц
ме1дт
мей3с2
мей1
мей2ст2
ме1фæ
м1г
1м2у.
1мув
1мум
му1ми
мус1
1му1л
м1ч
м1к
фæг1
1фæд
м1г
1мы1ха
м1д2
м1п
мпио2ни
мпи1о
м1фа
м1фо
1мы
2б.
1ба
ба1влы1
ба1ски
баск2
ба1н2ц
банци2
б1в
1бра1ва
3брав2и.
бра1ви
б3равил
б3равиг
б3равих
б1ра1ве
1бра1вы
б1раб
б1рас1
брат2
бра3т1н
бра3т1к
1бра1на
3бран2и.
бра1ни
б3ранил
3брани1т
б3раних
б3ра3не
3б4ране2н.
1бра1ны
1брад
2бра1зи1т
бра1зи
бра1х2т
1брос
2б1рол
брои2л
бро1и
бро1е4
б1рис
б1рич
4бр2е.
б1реч
б1рек
б1ред
б1м
бмис1
2б1с2
бст2
б2ст3ви
бсв1т2
бст3ве3на
бст3вено1т
бсв1те1но
бст3вен2и.
бсв1те1ни
бст3вени1т
бст3вений
бс1то4
б2фæ1ди
1бов
бо1в2т
бо1фæ
бос1в
бо1сту
бол4ни
бол1н
1бот
бо1ти
бо1ка
бо1ко
бо1д2р
бо1зн
бо1п2
бæмест3
бо1же
бо3ж2д2а.
бо2ж1д
бæм1да
бла2с3т2т
1блæм.
б1ла1жа
4блæдаван
блæ1да
блæда1ва
б1л2и.
б1лив
4бли1че
б1ли1ц
б1лыч
б1лык
б1лыд
б1лы2к1
блыко2
1бæ
б1т
2б1н
б3на
бност2
б1но
бно2с3тт
1б2и.
1бим
биб1
бист1
био1
1бин
би1ет
б1ич1н
би1ко
б3икн2а.
бик1на
б1ик3не
1би1ц
1биг
би1хм
1би1ц
б2е
1бер
бе1ми
1бен
бе1г2на
б2ег
бек3ти1т
бе1др
бед2н
бе3дн2о.
бед1но
бе1д1ни
бедих3м
бе1ди
бе2з1а
1бех
б1г
бу1р2н
бу1ре
бу1ру
бу1ми
бу1фæ
бу1с2л
бу1си
бу1ли
бу1ка
бу1ко
бу1ки
1буд
бу3ди
1бæм
б1ч
б1к
фæр3к2
1фæт
фæ3д2нат
фæд1н
фæд1на
фæ1д2не
б1г
бы1х
1б2де1но
б1де
б1з
б1х
2б1ц
бце3ст2ва
б1це
бцесв1т2
бце3св1то
б1ж
2с.
1с2а
сан1д
са1хм
сво2и1т
сво1и
сво2ет
сво1е
сво2ы1та
сво1ыт
1с4вир
с1ви
1све1та
1све2т1н
1ср
3сра1ми
2с3ра1мы
1см2и.
смис1л
с1мий
сме1с2т
с4менос
сме1но
3сменос3ти
1смее
1сфæ
1смы.
1смыл
с2ба
1со
со1бл
со1би
со1бы
со1т
со1к
со2кр
со1п
со4хм
со1х2т
со1фи
с1л2а.
2сла1ва
2слав2и.
сла1ви
4славие
с3лави1ет
3сланик
сла1ни
3слани1ц
с1лани2ы
с1л2о.
с1лор
с1лот
2слæм
сли1в
1слил
3слино2в.
сли1но
3слино1ва
3слино1ви
с1ли1ни
с1ли3не
с1лие
с1ли1ц
1слиг
1сли2х.
с1ли1ха
1сл2е.
1слыл
с1лы3на
с1лы1но
с3лыние
слы1ни
с3лыний
1с4лыд
слыз3ем
слыз3ег
2слы1пе
3слыпен2и.
слы1пен
слыпе1ни
1слых
1слы2й1
3с4луган
слу1га
1слу2г1н
1слу1г2е
с1лы1в
1слыл
1сæ
2с2т.
4стар
с1та
1с2та1с2а
4ста1ны
стау3
ст2ва1та
св1т2
ст1ва
2ст3ва1те
ст4ван
2св1та3не
2ст3ваг
3ст2ва1хм
3страсту
с3тро1ва
с3тров1н
ст1ро1т
1с1трир
ст1риб
3стре1но
с1тры
3с2тов2о.
с1то
сто1во
с4тов2и.
сто1ви
3с2тов2е.
сто1ве
3с2торим
сто1ри
4стоы2ван
сто1ы1в
стоы1ва
3стойнст1ва
с2той1
стой2н1с
стойнст2
стойнсв1т2
3стой1но
3стой1ни
2сæтæ
ст3на
с2т1н
1ст2нич
ст1ни
ст4ни1ц
с1тив
стус1
4стул
3стутел2и.
сту1т
сту1те
стуте1ли
3стутелы.
стуте1лы
4стуган
сту1га
с3тич
с1тик
с1ти1ц
с1тиг
4сте1не
с1те
1с2те1п
с4тыв2а.
с1ты
сты1в
сты1ва
ст4де
ст1д
3снаб1ды
с1на
с2наб
с3нат
с3нач
снах3т
снос3т2и.
с1но
сничест3
с1ни
сни1че
сниче3ст3ва
сничесв1т2
с3ни1ц
3снем2а.
с1не
сне1ма
1си1а
1сим
си1ме
1сис
си1сту
си3она1лы
сио1на
1си1т
1сии
си1ет
1си1к
си1ы1ы
1сид
си1з2
1сип
си1хм
си1х2т
1се
сериал3с
се1ри
сери3а2
с1ем1т
с1емн
се1ми
се1с
се2т2н
се3тниц2и.
сет1ни
сетни1ц
се3кре2т.
се1кл
сек1т
се1ки
се1з2
се1хм
се1х2т
1су
су1в
су1ро
су1б2е
су1ли
су1т
су1к
с2ч
ска1х2т
с1ках
с3к2ва3не
ск1ва
скрих3м
ско1с
1скот
с1кон
1скл
1ский
фæ1б
1фæс
фæо1р
фæ1о
фæо1бр
1фæл
1фæ1æ
фæ2н1ыт
фæ1ны
1фæч
1фæк
фæ1зр
с2ц
с3ци
1аги1т
с2г
1с1га
1с1г2е
1сы
с2д
с3ди
сп1рат
спомо3г1на
спо1мо
спомог1н
споы4
спу3ск2а.
с2х
с3ха
сх1ва3
сх2в
схват2
с1фа
2сфе
1сы
сыор1с
2о.
о1а
оа2р
овæм3н
о1ва
овæм2
о1рве
ов1фæс
ов1фæ1ц
о1во
ов1лас
